Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska26-105
Sexual assault protection order; petition, contents; relief granted.

(1) Any victim of a sexual assault offense may file a petition and affidavit for a sexual assault protection order as provided in this section. The petition shall state the events and dates or approximate dates of acts constituting the sexual assault offense, including the most recent and most severe incident or incidents.

(2) Upon the filing of such a petition and affidavit, the court may issue a sexual assault protection order, without bond, enjoining the respondent from:

(a) Imposing any restraint upon the person or liberty of the petitioner;

(b) Harassing, threatening, assaulting, molesting, attacking, or otherwise disturbing the peace of the petitioner; or

(c) Telephoning, contacting, or otherwise communicating with the petitioner.

(3) The court may order such other relief as the court deems necessary to provide for the safety and welfare of the petitioner.

Laws 2025, LB80, § 5.